Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.290

Out-of-state bail bond recovery agent.

A bail bond recovery agent from another state who is not licensed under this chapter may not perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent in this state unless the agent is working under the direct supervision of a licensed bail bond recovery agent.

[ 2004 c 186 s 11.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.